Washington statutes.
RCW 27.54.040

Semiquincentennial account. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

The semiquincentennial account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. Expenditures from the account may be used only to finance the activities of the semiquincentennial committee. Only the lieutenant governor and the director of the Washington state historical society may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2022 c 97 s 4.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2022 c 97: See note following RCW 27.54.010.